Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-104
Banner.

The county of Banner is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southeast corner of section thirty-six, in township seventeen, north, of range fifty-three, west of the sixth principal meridian; thence due north on the range line between range fifty-two and range fifty-three, to the northeast corner of section twenty-four, township twenty, north, range fifty-three, west; thence due west on the section line to the point where said section line intersects the east line of State of Wyoming; thence south along the west line of the State of Nebraska, to a point where said state line intersects the township line between townships sixteen and seventeen, north, of range fifty-eight, west; thence due east on said township line to the place of beginning.

Formed from Cheyenne County under Laws 1879, § 10, p. 355, by vote of electors Nov. 6, 1888;

R.S.1913, § 816;

C.S.1922, § 718;

C.S.1929, § 25-105;

R.S.1943, § 22-104.